Maryland, session 2025, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–313 through 7–319 of Article – General Provisions of the Annotated Code
of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 7–314 through 7–320, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – General Provisions
7–313.
THE ORIGINAL MARYLAND ORANGE CRUSH IS THE STATE COCKTAIL.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.